California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
In any action in which the recovery of a penalty assessed pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 830 is allowed by the court, the plaintiff shall be entitled to interest on the penalties for which recovery is allowed, at the applicable rate or rates in effect from time to time and payable on a refund of tax, as provided in Section 5151. This interest shall be payable from the date of filing of the claim for refund, but in no event earlier than the date of payment of the penalty or installments thereof sought to be refunded, to the date of entry of judgment. This accrued interest shall be included in the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 352, Sec. 12.   (SB 948)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

(a) Interest at the greater of 3 percent per annum or the county pool apportioned rate shall be paid, when that interest is ten dollars ($10) or more, on any amount refunded under Section 5096.7, or refunded to a taxpayer for any reason whatsoever. However, no interest shall be paid under the provisions of this section if the taxpayer has been given the notice required by Section 2635 and has failed to apply for the refund within 30 days after the mailing of that notice. For purposes of this section, “county pool apportioned rate” means the annualized rate of interest earned on the total amount of pooled idle funds from all accounts held by the county treasurer, in excess of the county treasurer’s administrative costs with respect to that amount,
 as of June 30 of the fiscal year preceding the date the refund is calculated by the auditor. For each fiscal year, the county treasurer shall advise the Controller of the county pool apportioned rate, and of computations made in deriving that rate, no later than 90 days after the end of that fiscal year. Any interest paid on a refund at a rate provided for by this subdivision as it read prior to January 1, 2009, shall be deemed to be correct.

(b) The interest rate provided for in subdivision (a) does not apply to interest on refunds of those amounts of tax that became due and payable before March 1, 1993. Interest on refunds of amounts of a qualified tax shall be paid at that rate provided for by this section as it read prior to January 1, 1993. As used in this section, a “qualified tax” means a tax that became due and payable before
 March 1, 1993, and had not been refunded as of April 6, 1995. This subdivision shall not be construed to affect the interest paid on refunds of those amounts of tax that became due and payable before March 1, 1993, and have been refunded as of April 6, 1995.

(c) (1) The interest computation period shall commence with the date of payment of the tax when any of the following applies:

(A) A timely application for reduction in an assessment was filed, without regard to whether the refund ultimately results from a judgment or order of a court, an order of a board of equalization or assessment appeals board, or an assessor’s correction to the assessment roll.

(B) The refund is pursuant to a roll correction
 resulting from the determination or adjustment by the assessor or a local assessment appeals board of a base year value.

(C) The refund results from a correction to the assessment roll pursuant to Section 4831 or 4876.

(2) Interest on refunds of taxes on property acquired by a public agency in eminent domain shall accrue from the date of recordation of the deed.

(3) In all other cases the interest computation period shall commence on the date of filing a claim for refund or payment of the tax, whichever is later. However, in the event of the granting of property tax relief pursuant to Section 69, 69.3, or 170, interest is not payable on any resulting refund of taxes, provided that payment of that refund of taxes is
 made within 120 days after the county assessor has sent authorization for the reduction to the county auditor.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (h), the computation of interest shall terminate as of a date within 30 days of the date of mailing or personal delivery of the refund payment.

(e) The interest charged shall be apportioned to the appropriate funds, as determined by the county auditor.

(f) The amendments made to this section by Section 4 of Chapter 801 of the Statutes of 1996 shall apply to all refunds made after January 1, 1997.

(g) Whenever a refund is due and a claim for refund is required under this chapter, the county auditor may send notice
 of the refund to the taxpayer, unless the taxpayer already filed a refund claim pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5097. If a notice is sent, the notice shall be mailed to the taxpayer’s last known address and shall state the amount of overpayment and that a claim for refund may be filed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 922, Sec. 7.   (AB 3134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

In an action in which the recovery of taxes is allowed by the court, if the court finds that the void assessment or void portion of the assessment was made in violation of a specific provision of the Constitution of the State of California, of this division, or of a rule or regulation of the board, and the assessor should have followed the procedures set forth in Section 538 in lieu of making the assessment, the plaintiff shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees as costs in addition to the other allowable costs. This section is ancillary only, and shall not be construed to create a new cause of action nor to be in lieu of any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

5153.

Notwithstanding Sections 5150 and 5151, whenever the auditor has impounded revenues pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 26906.1 of the Government Code and those revenues are ultimately used to provide a refund of tax to the affected taxpayer or taxpayers, interest due to the taxpayer or taxpayers for the period that those funds were impounded shall be calculated and paid at the rate, or rates where the applicable rate fluctuated, earned by the county on those revenues during the period of impoundment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Action by Public Agency [5161. - 5161.]

5161.

(a) Any action to recover taxes pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5140) by any county, city and county, or municipal corporation shall be brought and tried in any county other than the plaintiff or the county in which the plaintiff is situated and other than the defendant or the county in which defendant is situated.

(b) No judge of the superior court in the plaintiff county or the county in which the plaintiff is situated or in the defendant county or the county in which the defendant is situated shall sit or act in any action brought pursuant to this section.

(1) Any party to or any attorney appearing in any such action may establish such disqualification by an oral or written motion without notice supported by affidavit that the judge before whom such action is pending or to whom it is assigned is disqualified by virtue of this section. Where the judge assigned to or who is scheduled to try the cause or hear the matter is known at least 10 days before the date set for trial or hearing, the motion shall be made at least five days before that date. If directed to the trial of a cause where there is a master calendar, the motion shall be made to the judge supervising the master calendar not later than the time the cause is assigned for trial. In no event shall any judge entertain such motion if it be made after the making of an opening statement by counsel for plaintiff, or if there be no such statement, then after swearing in the first witness or the giving of any evidence or after trial of the cause has otherwise commenced. If the motion is directed to a hearing (other than the trial of a cause), the motion must be made not later than the commencement of the hearing. In the case of trials or hearings not herein specifically provided for, the procedure herein specified shall be followed as nearly as may be.

(2) If such motion is duly presented and such affidavit is duly filed, thereupon and without any further act or proof, the judge supervising the master calendar, if any, shall assign some other judge to try the cause or hear the matter. In other cases, the trial of the cause or the hearing of the matter shall be assigned or transferred to another judge of the court in which the trial or matter is pending or, if there is no other judge of the court in which the trial or matter is pending, the chairman of the judicial council shall assign some other judge to try such cause or hear such matter as promptly as possible. Under no circumstances shall a party or attorney be permitted to make more than one such motion in any one action pursuant to this section; and in actions where there may be more than one plaintiff or similar party or more than one defendant or similar party appearing in the action, only one motion for each side may be made in any one action or special proceeding.

(3) Unless required for the convenience of the court or unless good cause is shown, a continuance of the trial or hearing shall not be granted by reason of the making of a motion under this section. If a continuance is granted, the cause or matter shall be continued from day to day or for other limited periods upon the trial or other calendar and shall be reassigned or transferred for trial or hearing as promptly as possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Scope of Judicial Review of Assessments in Refund Actions [5170. - 5170.]

5170.

In suits for the refund of state-assessed property taxes, the trial court shall not be restricted to the administrative record, but shall consider all evidence relating to the valuation of the property admissible under the rules of evidence. The court shall base its decision upon the preponderance of the evidence before it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1372, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. AIRCRAFT ASSESSMENT AND TAXATION [5301. - 5456.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [5301. - 5304.]

5301.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to provide for a uniform countywide system of ad valorem taxation of all aircraft in this State, regardless of where the aircraft is based in the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

(a) “Aircraft” means any contrivance used or designed for the navigation of or for flight in the air which has been flown at least once, other than a parachute or similar emergency safety device.

(b) “Aircraft” does not include any of the following:

(1) Rockets or missiles.

(2) Aircraft operated exclusively by an air carrier or foreign air carrier, as respectively defined in
 Section 40102(a)(2) and (21) of Title 49 of the United States Code, engaged in air transportation, as defined in Section 40102(a)(5) of that title, while there is in force a certificate or permit
 issued by the
 Federal Aviation Administration, or its successor, authorizing such air carrier to engage in such transportation.

(3) Air taxis, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1154.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 19.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5304.

“In this State” means within the exterior limits of the State of California, and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Exemptions [5331. - 5332.]

5331.

Aircraft owned by the United States, by any foreign government, or by a consul or other official representative of any foreign government, are exempt from personal property taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5332.

Aircraft owned by this State or by any county, city and county, city, district, political subdivision, public corporation or authority of this State are exempt from personal property taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Assessment [5362. - 5368.]

5362.

The assessor of the county in which the aircraft is habitually situated shall assess the aircraft at its market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

In assessing aircraft, the county assessor shall determine the market value of the aircraft in accordance with standards and guides to the market value of aircraft prescribed by the board. In determining the market value of aircraft the assessor shall not take into account the existence of any custom or common method, if any, in arriving at the market value of any class or classes of aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5364.

The board shall establish standards and fix guides or, after a public hearing, shall review and approve commercially available guides, to be used by the county assessor in the assessment of aircraft at market value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5365.

Upon request of the assessor of the county in which an aircraft is habitually based, the owner shall file with the assessor a statement setting forth information about the aircraft that is necessary to ascertain the full value of the aircraft, including, but not limited to, the serial number, the make, model, year of manufacture of the aircraft, and engine and maintenance information, including the total hours logged on the aircraft following the last major overhaul of the engine of the aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 200, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5366.

Owners, as well as operators, of private and public airports shall, within 15 days following the lien date of each year, provide the assessor of the county in which the airport is situated with a statement containing a list of names and addresses of the owners, and the make, model, and aircraft registration number, of all aircraft which were using the airport as a base. The assessors of each county shall, not later than the deadline to submit the required statistical statement pursuant to Section 407, provide the California Department of Transportation, Division of Aeronautics with a statement containing a list of names, addresses of owners, make, model, aircraft registration number, and assessed value of all aircraft which were using airports in the county as a base.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 427, Sec. 22.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5367.

If any person who is requested to file a statement pursuant to Section 5365 fails to file such statement by the time specified by the assessor, a penalty of 10 percent of the market value of the unreported aircraft shall be added to the value of the aircraft of such person which is placed on the current roll.

If the assessee establishes to the satisfaction of the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board that the failure to file the statement was due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, it may order the penalty abated; provided, that the assessee has filed with the county board written application for abatement of the penalty within the time prescribed by law for the filing of applications for assessment reductions.

If the penalty is abated, it shall be canceled or refunded in the same manner as an amount of tax erroneously charged or collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

5368.

Owners, as well as operators, of private and public airports shall provide, upon the request of the assessor of the county in which the airport is situated, a statement containing the make, model, aircraft registration number, and arrival and departure information of all aircraft utilizing the airport facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 180, Sec. 5.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Levy [5391. - 5392.]

5391.

For the 1980–81 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, aircraft subject to this part shall be taxed at the same rate and in the same manner as all other personal property. Aircraft which are considered business inventories, within the meaning of Section 129 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be included in the inventory exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 610, Sec. 3.5.   Effective July 18, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5392.

The tax on aircraft subject to this part shall be collected in the same manner as all other personal property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   Effective July 18, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Distribution [5451. - 5456.]

5451.

The revenue derived from any tax levied pursuant to this part shall be distributed as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5452.

If the aircraft are habitually based in a city and any school districts, the proceeds shall be distributed one-third to the city, one-third to the school districts, and one-third to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5453.

If the aircraft are habitually based outside of a city, but in any school districts, the proceeds shall be distributed one-half to the school districts and one-half to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5454.

If the aircraft are habitually based in an elementary school district and a high school district, the proceeds allotted to school districts shall be divided equally between the elementary school district and the high school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5455.

It is the purpose of this chapter to divide the proceeds allotted to school districts equally between districts supporting elementary schools and districts supporting high schools, excluding all other educational districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5456.

The details of the method of distribution shall be supplied by the county auditor and shall fairly carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 202, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. TAXATION OF RACEHORSES [5701. - 5790.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [5701. - 5720.6.]

5701.

The Legislature finds that subjecting racehorses to the general property tax has resulted in a serious lack of uniformity as between one county and another respecting the method used in arriving at an assessed value; that this has resulted in serious inequities between the owners of racehorses depending in part on the county wherein they are assessed; that a continuation of current assessment practices will result in a substantial decrease in the breeding, boarding, and training of racehorses for racing competition in California and that current assessment practices have caused racehorse owners to remove their horses from California to other major breeding states with the result that over a period of time if these assessment practices are continued, both the breeding and racing of racehorses in California will suffer in that the quality and quantity of racehorses will be reduced and impaired; that a severe loss of employment and taxes to breeding and racing will result, attendance at race meetings will decrease, and betting will be reduced with consequent substantial loss of revenue to California. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this part, to establish a more equitable method of taxing racehorses and thereby provide incentives to owners of these horses to maintain their horses within the state by providing for a uniform system of in-lieu taxation for the racehorses subject to the provisions of this part. The Legislature further finds that, because Arabian horses begin racing and breeding at least one year later than other breeds, Arabian horses should be treated equitably by allowing that breed four years before they are required to begin racing or be engaged in breeding activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1250, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5702.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1759.)
-------------------------------------------

5703.

“Racehorse” means each live horse, including a stallion, mare, gelding, ridgeling, colt, filly, or foal, that is or will be eligible to participate in or produce foals which will be eligible to participate in a horseracing contest in California wherein parimutuel racing is permitted under rules and regulations prescribed by the California Horse Racing Board. “Racehorse” does not mean or include any horse over three years old, or four years old in the case of an Arabian horse, that has not participated in a horserace contest on which parimutuel wagering is permitted or has not been used for breeding purposes in order to produce racehorses during the two previous calendar years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1250, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5704.

“Owner” means the owner of a racehorse or his agent. Any other person claiming, possessing or controlling a racehorse shall provide the name and address of the owner thereof or his agent upon the request of the assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1759.)
-------------------------------------------

5705.

“Annual tax” means a tax that is imposed on the owner for any racehorse domiciled in the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5706.

“Current calendar year” means the yearly period from the first day of January to the last day of December, inclusive for which the tax is imposed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5707.

“Previous calendar year” means the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the annual tax is imposed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5710.

“Stallion” means any racehorse which, during the two previous calendar years, has serviced three or more different broodmares for the purpose of producing a racehorse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5711.

“Producing broodmare” means a racehorse mare which, during the previous calendar year, has produced a live foal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5712.

“Nonproducing broodmare” means a racehorse mare which has not produced a live foal during the previous calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5713.

“Stakes-winning broodmare” means a broodmare which has won at any time during her life a race with a purse to which owners of participating horses have contributed nomination, entry, or starting fees or a recognized stakes race in which all entrants raced by invitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5714.

“Stakes-producing broodmare” means a broodmare which has produced at any time during her life a racehorse which has won a race with a purse to which owners of participating horses have contributed nomination, entry, or starting fees or a recognized stakes race in which all entrants raced by invitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5715.

“Stakes yearling”, “stakes two-year-old”, or “stakes three-year-old” means a racehorse of the designated age which was foaled by a stakes-winning or stakes-producing broodmare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5716.

“Yearling” means a racehorse which was foaled during the previous calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5716.5.

“Foal” means a racehorse which is foaled during the current calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5717.

“Active racehorse” means a racehorse which has participated in a horseracing contest on which parimutuel wagering was permitted during the previous calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5718.

“Nonactive racehorse” means any racehorse which has not participated in any horseracing contest on which parimutuel wagering was permitted during the previous calendar year, except a racehorse three years of age or younger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5719.

“Live foal” means a foal which has lived for a period of three days or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1759.)
-------------------------------------------

5720.

“Stud fee” is the sum of money charged by a stallion owner for the mating of his stallion to a broodmare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1759.)
-------------------------------------------

5720.5.

“Stud fee classification” will be determined by the highest stud fee charged for the mating of a mare to a stallion during the previous calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5720.6.

“Domicile” means:

(a) The home ranch on January 1 of the current calendar year of the owner of a racehorse or other place where the horse is quartered when not racing or in training to race.

(b) The residence on January 1 of the current calendar year of the owner of any racehorse that is not quartered at a home ranch or other location when not racing or in training to race.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [5721. - 5722.]

5721.

For the 1973 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, on the privilege of breeding, training, caring for or racing a racehorse in this state, there is hereby imposed an annual tax on owners of racehorses for such racehorses domiciled in this state, which shall be in lieu of any property tax on racehorses subject to taxation pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5722.

The annual tax is imposed on and shall be paid by the owner on the following basis:Age 12Age 13STALLIONSand youngerand olderStud fee classification$10,000 and up $1,000$6507,500 and up 750 5005,000 and up 500 3303,000 and up 300 2001,500 and up 150 1001,000 and up 100 65Less than 1,000 75 50BROODMARESStakes-winning producingbroodmares 75 50Stakes-producingbroodmares 75 50Other producingbroodmares 40 28Stakes-winning nonproducingbroodmares 35 25Other nonproducingbroodmares 20 12ACTIVE RACEHORSESRacehorses which in theprevious calendar yearearned:$100,000 or more 150Between 50,000and 99,999 100Between 25,000and 49,999 60Less than 25,000 40OTHER RACEHORSESStakes yearlings, stakestwo-year-olds, stakesthree-year-olds 35Other yearlings, two-year-olds, three-year-olds, andnonactive racehorses 20

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [5741. - 5741.]

5741.

Foals born to a racehorse mare during the current calendar year shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this part or by any other part of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection [5761. - 5768.]

5761.

The tax imposed pursuant to this part shall be determined as of 12:01 a. m. January 1 of the calendar year for which it is imposed and shall be immediately due and payable to the tax collector of the county in which the racehorse is domiciled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5762.

The tax imposed by this part shall become delinquent at 5 p.m. on the 15th day of February of the calendar year for which it is imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5763.

A delinquent penalty of 6 percent shall attach at 5 p.m. on the day any tax imposed by this part becomes delinquent. An additional penalty of 1 percent shall attach to the tax on the first day of the first calendar month commencing after the tax becomes delinquent and on the first day of each calendar month thereafter, until the delinquent tax and penalties have been paid in full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5764.

If, in the opinion of the tax collector, the amount of tax required to be paid to the county pursuant to this part, or any portion thereof, will be jeopardized by delay, the tax collector shall thereupon make a determination of the tax or the amount of tax to be collected. The amount so determined shall be immediately due and payable. Such jeopardy determinations and the amount of tax found to be due thereunder may be collected by the tax collector by any legal means, including, but not limited to, the procedures established pursuant to Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 2851), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2901), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3002), and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3101) of Part 5 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5765.

(a) The assessor may perform audits of the books and records of any owner of racehorses subject to the tax imposed by this part in the county to determine if the correct information has been reported and the proper amount of tax has been paid.

(b) In those cases wherein the board determines that an audit would have been required under Section 469 if the racehorses were subject to property taxation, rather than to the provisions of this part, the assessor shall perform such audits of the books and records of the owners of racehorses subject to the tax imposed by this part as the board by rules and regulations may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5766.

The tax described in this part may be imposed at any time within five years after the tax would have otherwise become due and the penalties shall date from the time described in Section 5763.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5767.

If any person required by Section 5782 to file a report fails to file it by the time specified, the tax collector shall impose on the lawful amount of taxes due under this part, a penalty equal to 10 percent of the tax, and the penalties provided by Section 5763. If any person required to file the report required by Section 5782 files any false or fraudulent report with an intent to defeat or evade any tax due under this part, the tax collector shall impose on the lawful amount of tax due under this part, a penalty equal to 25 percent of the tax, and the penalties provided by Section 5763.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5768.

Upon request of the assessor, an owner of racehorses of a type subject to the tax imposed by this part shall make available at his principal place of business, principal location or principal address in California or at any place mutually agreeable to the assessor and the owner, a true copy of business records relevant to the number and type of racehorses located in any county of the state during any taxable period and the number of days spent in each county during that period. Records referred to in this section shall be retained by the owner for a period of five years from the date any tax to which they relate becomes due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Administration [5781. - 5790.]

5781.

The State Board of Equalization shall make such reasonable rules and regulations and prepare such forms as are necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1759.)
-------------------------------------------

5782.

On forms provided through the office of the assessor, the owner of a racehorse either in person, through his representative or by mail, shall report the tax due. The reports required by this section may be filed with the tax collector of the county in which the racehorse had its domicile. The reports shall be filed on or before 5:00 p.m. on the day the tax due becomes delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.

The auditor of the county in which a report is filed shall transfer any taxes paid pursuant to this part belonging to another county as shown on the report, together with a copy of the report, in order that the auditor of any county receiving transferred funds can allocate them in the manner provided for in Section 5790.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 35.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.

All proceeds derived from the tax, interest, and penalties imposed by this part shall be allocated by the auditor as promptly as is feasible in the following manner:

(a) If the domicile of the racehorse was located within a city and any school district, the proceeds from such racehorse shall be distributed one-third to the city, one-third to the school district, and one-third to the county.

(b) If the domicile of the racehorse was located outside of any city but was located within one or more school districts, the proceeds from such racehorse shall be distributed one-half to the school district or districts and one-half to the county.

(c) If the domicile of the racehorse was located in both an elementary school district and a high school district, the proceeds allocable to school districts shall be divided equally between the elementary and high school districts to the exclusion of all other school districts.

The details of the method of allocation shall be supplied by the county auditor, and shall fairly carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5801 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 285, Sec. 6.   Effective June 30, 1980.   Operative July 1, 1980, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. TAXATION OF MANUFACTURED HOMES [5800. - 5842.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [5800. - 5805.]

5800.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Manufactured Home Property Tax Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5801.

(a) As used in Part 0.5 (commencing with Section 50), Part 1 (commencing with Section 101), Part 2 (commencing with Section 201), and this part, “manufactured home” means a manufactured home as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code or a mobilehome as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code which:

(1) Was first sold new on or after July 1, 1980. 

(2) Was, at the request of the owner, and following his or her notification of the Department of Housing and Community Development and the assessor, made subject to taxation under this part. 

(b) (1) “Manufactured home,” as used in this part, does not include a manufactured home which has become real property by being affixed to land on a permanent foundation system pursuant to Section 18551 of the Health and Safety Code and is taxed as all other real property is taxed. 

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), a manufactured home, otherwise subject to taxation pursuant to this part, shall not be classified as real property for property taxation purposes that would be excluded from taxation pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5802.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), “base year value” as used in this part means the full cash value of a manufactured home on the date the manufactured home is purchased or changes ownership. If the manufactured home undergoes any new construction after it is purchased or changes ownership, the base year value of the new construction is its full cash value on the date on which the new construction is completed, and if uncompleted, on the lien date.

(b) The base year value of a manufactured home for which the license fee is delinquent shall be its full cash value on the lien date for the fiscal year in which it is first enrolled.

(c) The base year value of a manufactured home converted pursuant to Section 18119 of the Health and Safety Code from taxation under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 to taxation under this part shall be its full cash value on the lien date for the fiscal year in which that manufactured home is first enrolled. A manufactured home that has been converted is not subject to supplemental assessment pursuant to Section 75.5 by reason of the conversion.

(d) The base year value of a manufactured home that changes ownership in the same calendar year after a conversion in the same calendar year, shall be its full cash value on the date of the change in ownership and its value shall be enrolled on the next lien date. The change in ownership is not subject to supplemental assessment as provided in Section 75.5.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 36.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5803.

(a) “Full cash value” means the “full cash value” or the “fair market value,” as determined pursuant to Section 110, of a manufactured home similarly equipped and installed, including any value attributable to a manufactured home accessory building or structure as defined in Section 18008.5 of the Health and Safety Code which is sold along with the manufactured home, giving recognition, however, to the exemption provided in subdivision (m) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution.
